Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 2

Veterans' Memorials

58-4-201. Appropriations by county legislative bodies.

The county legislative bodies are authorized to appropriate, by a roll call and recorded vote, from their respective county treasuries, money to be expended solely in the erection of permanent monuments or buildings or libraries or any other evidence of appreciation of the bravery and valor of soldiers, sailors, and marines, within the respective counties appropriating the same, but not from any special fund heretofore provided by law, to the honor and memory of the living and dead American soldiers, sailors, and marines, collectively, who served in World War I, II, or the War Between the States, but it is expressly provided that no sum in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) shall be appropriated by any one (1) county for such purpose.

Acts 1919, ch. 10, § 1; 1919, ch. 41, § 1; 1925, ch. 28, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 6054a6; Code 1932, § 10243; Acts 1943, ch. 83, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10243; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-901.

Cross-References. Borrowing for erection of memorials by municipalities or counties authorized, § 58-4-208.

State veterans' cemeteries, title 46, ch. 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 7.

58-4-202. County monument or building commissioners.

When any county makes any such appropriation, the county legislative body making it shall elect five (5) reputable citizens of the respective county, over eighteen (18) years of age, who shall be known as the county monument or building commissioners, who shall be duly sworn faithfully to discharge their duties as such, and whose duty it shall be to superintend the erection of the monument or building under the general orders and direction of the legislative body; and it is expressly provided that such commissioners shall, when the monument or building has been completed and delivered, forthwith make a full and complete detailed report in writing to the county legislative body in open session, which shall be spread of record in the legislative body, accounting definitely and with detailed particulars for every dollar coming into their hands.

Acts 1919, ch. 10, § 3; 1919, ch. 41, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 6054a8; Code 1932, § 10245; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-902.

58-4-203. Filing of plans — Accounting for funds.

Before any part of any such appropriation shall be paid out of any county treasury, there shall first be filed with the county trustee of the county making the appropriation, plans and specifications of the proposed monument or building or library or other evidence of appreciation, with a detailed estimate of every cost and expense of the same; and it is further provided as an absolute prerequisite to the paying out of any part of any such appropriation that the persons receiving the appropriation, or any part thereof, shall give the trustee detailed vouchers approved by county monument or building commissioners and the county mayor in open court and personally receipted in writing by the payees and duly entered of record in detail in the books of the county clerk, in such manner and form as to clearly and definitely show for what purpose the money was paid and to whom, etc.

Acts 1919, ch. 10, § 2; 1919, ch. 41, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 6054a7; Code 1932, § 10244; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-903; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

58-4-204. Appropriation limited to work and material.

No part of any such appropriation shall be expended for land, fees, or salaries, but shall all be used for the erection of the monument or building, and all such money shall be alone for work on and material entering into the construction of the monument or building.

Acts 1919, ch. 10, § 4; 1919, ch. 41, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 6054a9; Code 1932, § 10246; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-904.

58-4-205. Penalty for misappropriation of funds.

Any and all persons accepting the custody or control of any part of any such appropriation provided for, who misappropriates or aids in the misappropriation or willful diversion of any part of the same is guilty of a Class E felony, which penalty may be commuted to six (6) months in the workhouse in the discretion of the court, and shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) which, when collected, shall be paid into the county school fund.

Acts 1919, ch. 10, § 5; 1919, ch. 41, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 6054a10; Code 1932, § 10247; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-905; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 76.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

58-4-206. Municipal and county memorials.

Each municipality and county of the state is authorized and empowered to erect suitable public memorials and to contract for the erection of such memorials to the services of the members of the armed forces and veterans of the various wars in which Tennesseans have fought. The memorials selected shall be in the form of any public improvement approved as hereinafter provided by the governing body of such municipality or county and may include public buildings, hospitals, schools and auditoriums (but such enumeration shall not limit the discretion of such governing body of the municipality or county in its selection of appropriate memorials).

Acts 1945, ch. 131, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.18 (Williams, § 1012.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-906.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Military, § 10.

58-4-207. Cooperation with federal government.

Each municipality and county of the state acting under §§ 58-4-206 — 58-4-208 is expressly authorized to cooperate with the federal government or any other governmental agencies in the planning, erecting and financing of any memorial hereunder, and is authorized to receive from such governmental agencies, pursuant to any plan of cooperation with such governmental agencies gifts, bounties or grants-in-aid of any character to supplement or entirely finance the cost of any project undertaken pursuant to §§ 58-4-206 — 58-4-208.

Acts 1945, ch. 131, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.19 (Williams, § 1012.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-907.

58-4-208. Borrowing power — Bonds.

Each municipality and county of the state, acting by and through its governing body, is authorized to borrow money and to issue and sell bonds of such municipality or county pursuant to title 9, chapter 21 for the purpose of providing the funds necessary to carry out the purposes of §§ 58-4-206 — 58-4-208.

Acts 1945, ch. 131, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.20 (Williams, § 1012.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-908; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 65.